Utah statutes.
57-8a-208.   Fines.
(1)  Unless otherwise provided in the association's governing documents, the
board of a homeowner association may assess a fine against a lot owner for a
violation of the association's governing documents after the requirements of
Subsection (2) are met.
(2)  Before assessing a fine under Subsection (1), the board shall:
(a)  notify the lot owner of the violation; and
(b)  inform the owner that a fine will be imposed if the violation is not
remedied within the time provided in the association's governing documents,
which shall be at least 48 hours.
(3) (a)  A fine assessed under Subsection (1) shall:
(i)  be made only for a violation of a rule, covenant, condition, or
restriction that is specifically listed in the association's governing
documents;
(ii)  be in the amount specifically provided for in the association's
governing documents for that specific type of violation or in an amount
commensurate with the nature of the violation; and
(iii)  accrue interest and late fees as provided in the association's
governing documents.
(b)  Unpaid fines may be collected as an unpaid assessment as set forth in the
association's governing documents or in this chapter.
(4) (a)  A lot owner who is assessed a fine under Subsection (1) may request
an informal hearing to protest or dispute the fine within 14 days from the
date the fine is assessed.
(b)  A hearing requested under Subsection (4)(a) shall be conducted in
accordance with standards provided in the association's governing documents.
(c)  No interest or late fees may accrue until after the hearing has been
conducted and a final decision has been rendered.
